Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 8. Count and Return of Votes

§ 2581.
Closing polls.

When the hours set for voting, including extended hours of voting, have expired, the presiding officer at each polling place shall publicly announce that the polls are closed.
He or she shall then ensure that all persons who are not election officials are prevented from entering within the guardrail until all votes have been counted and ballots secured as provided in this subchapter.
Persons who are not election officials may remain within the polling place but outside the guardrail, or within a designated area in any other room where ballots are being counted, provided that they are able to observe the counting process, but that they do not in any way interfere with the orderly count and return of votes.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 80.

§ 2582.
Presiding officer to direct count; transporting ballots or checklist.

The presiding officer shall direct the manner in which the votes are counted, subject to the provisions of this title and as provided for in the rules for counting ballots adopted by the Secretary of State. Ballots shall be counted at the polling places where they are cast, except where the Secretary of State, upon request of the presiding officer, has issued a determination that the ballots should be counted elsewhere, or the checklist should be moved by two elections officials of different parties for the purpose of making a photocopy.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 81;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2003, No. 59

, § 36.

§ 2583.
Official checklist to be tallied; storage of checklist.

The presiding officer, as soon after the closing of the polls as possible, shall cause both certified checklists to be examined and the number of voters checked as having voted to be tallied. Both tallies shall be recorded by the presiding officer. The presiding officer shall prepare a statement listing any discrepancies between the checklists, including the names involved and other details relating to the discrepancies.
(a) (1) The presiding officer, as soon after the closing of the polls as possible, shall cause both certified checklists to be examined and the number of voters checked as having voted to be tallied. Both tallies shall be recorded by the presiding officer. The presiding officer shall prepare a statement listing any discrepancies between the checklists, including the names involved and other details relating to the discrepancies.

Unless the board of civil authority votes not to use an exit checklist under section 2507 of this chapter, each checklist shall be identified as either the “entrance” or “exit” checklist, and the exit checklist, together with a statement of discrepancies, shall be sealed and stored with the ballots and tally sheets as provided in section 2590 of this chapter. The entrance checklist shall be safely stored so that the public cannot have access to it for a period of 90 days except under the direct supervision of the town clerk.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 82;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 59

, § 37;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 2584.
Opening of ballot boxes; distribution of ballots.

After the closing of the polls, the presiding officer shall open the ballot boxes and distribute the ballots among the election officials in approximately equal numbers.
As nearly as may be, election officials shall work in pairs while counting ballots, each pair consisting of members of different parties.
Once ballots are distributed to a pair of election officials, that pair shall retain the same ballots throughout the counting process.
If more than one kind of ballot has been used in the election, only one kind at a time shall be distributed.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2585.
Ballots not to be written upon.

No person shall in any manner, nor for any reason, make any mark upon either the face or reverse side of any ballots, during the counting process.
All notations, arithmetic, or other marking shall be done upon separate pieces of scratch paper.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2586.
Tally sheets; summary sheets; returns.

The Secretary of State shall design, prepare, and distribute a sufficient supply of the following forms, which may be used in each polling place during the counting process:

Tally sheets.

These sheets shall provide a place to identify the office or question for which the ballots are being counted, the name of each candidate for that office, and the signature of the pair of election officials actually counting the ballots.

Votes for each candidate or question shall be recorded on the tally sheets by means of “tick” marks or some other convenient system, and the total shall then be written on the tally sheet.

Blank votes (undervotes) and overvotes shall be indicated.

In towns that count ballots by hand, all votes must be accounted for on the tally sheets.

Summary sheets. These sheets shall be used to record the totals shown on all tally sheets in the polling place for each office or public question, and the sum of such totals. They shall provide a place to identify the office or public question, the candidates, and the signatures of the presiding officer and at least one other election official.

Return. The return shall be prepared in duplicate and used to make the official report from each polling place of the grand totals of all votes cast in the polling place. It shall identify the polling place, and each candidate or question receiving votes, and shall be signed by the presiding officer and at least one other election official.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 42.

§ 2587.
Rules for counting votes.

In counting votes, election officials shall attempt to ascertain the intent of the voter as expressed by markings on the ballot and in a manner that is consistent with guidance that shall be adopted by rule by the Secretary of State.
(a) (1) In counting votes, election officials shall attempt to ascertain the intent of the voter as expressed by markings on the ballot and in a manner that is consistent with guidance that shall be adopted by rule by the Secretary of State.

If it is impossible to determine the intent of the voter for any office or public question, the vote shall be counted as a blank or overvote, as the case may be, for that office or question; but that determination shall not control any other office or question appearing on the ballot for which the voter’s intent can be determined.

If they have any doubt about the intent of the voter or any other question about a vote, the election officials counting the vote shall bring it to the presiding officer, who shall present the question of how to treat the vote to the assembled election officials. The decision of how to treat the vote shall be made by majority vote of the election officials who are present.

If the voter marks more names than there are persons to be elected to an office, or marks contradictory sides on any public question, overvotes equal to the number of candidates to be elected to the office must be recorded on the tally sheet for that office or question.

A write-in vote for a candidate whose name is preprinted on the ballot shall be counted as a vote for that candidate.
(c) (1) A write-in vote for a candidate whose name is preprinted on the ballot shall be counted as a vote for that candidate.

A person who receives more than one vote for the same office on any ballot shall be entitled to one vote, and one vote only.

If the board of civil authority decides by majority vote of those present that any markings on a ballot were made for the purpose of enabling it to be identified and the vote traced, so as to defeat the secrecy of the ballot:

that ballot shall be:

rejected;

marked defective and affixed with a note from the presiding officer as to why it was marked defective; and

placed in the defective ballot envelope in accordance with subsection 2547(b) of this chapter; and

the election officials may edit the vote tabulator totals reported on the vote tabulator tape, as necessary.

In the case of “write-in” votes, the act of writing in the name of a candidate, or pasting a label containing a candidate’s name upon the ballot, without other indications of the voter’s intent, shall constitute a vote for that candidate, even though the voter did not fill in the square or oval after the name.
(e) (1) In the case of “write-in” votes, the act of writing in the name of a candidate, or pasting a label containing a candidate’s name upon the ballot, without other indications of the voter’s intent, shall constitute a vote for that candidate, even though the voter did not fill in the square or oval after the name.

The election officials counting ballots and tallying results shall list every person who receives a “write-in” vote and the number of votes received.

On each tally sheet, the counters shall add together the names of candidates that are clearly the same person, even though a nickname or last name is used.

Names of fictitious or deceased persons shall not be listed and shall be recorded on the tally sheet as a blank vote.

When the same number of persons are nominated for the position of justice of the peace as there are positions to be filled, the presiding officer may declare the whole slate of candidates elected without making individual tallies, providing each person on the slate has more votes than the largest number of write-in votes for any one candidate.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 83-85;

2003, No. 59

, § 38;

2015, No. 30

, § 17a, eff. May 26, 2015;

2017, No. 50

, § 43.

§ 2588.
Filing returns.

For any primary or general election:

In towns that count all ballots by hand, as the count of votes for each office or public question is completed, the presiding officer and at least one other election official shall collect the tally sheets, enter the totals shown on the tally sheets upon the summary sheets, add and enter the sum of the figures, and sign the summary sheets.
(1) (A) In towns that count all ballots by hand, as the count of votes for each office or public question is completed, the presiding officer and at least one other election official shall collect the tally sheets, enter the totals shown on the tally sheets upon the summary sheets, add and enter the sum of the figures, and sign the summary sheets.

As each summary sheet is completed, the presiding officer shall publicly announce the results.

In towns that use vote tabulators, after the close of the polls and after all remaining absentee or transfer ballots have been fed into the vote tabulator, the presiding officer shall insert the ender card and the tabulator will print a tape of unofficial results. The presiding officer shall print at least one additional copy of the tabulator tape.
(2) (A) In towns that use vote tabulators, after the close of the polls and after all remaining absentee or transfer ballots have been fed into the vote tabulator, the presiding officer shall insert the ender card and the tabulator will print a tape of unofficial results. The presiding officer shall print at least one additional copy of the tabulator tape.

The unofficial results from the tape may be publicly announced, and one copy of the printed tape may be posted in the polling place upon a placard that clearly states: “Unofficial incomplete results.”

The town clerk shall report as soon as practicable on the day of the election the unofficial vote counts of all candidates whose names appeared on the ballot to the Secretary of State. The report shall be made by electronically submitting the vote counts on the Secretary’s online elections reporting system or, if unable to submit electronically, by submitting those vote counts to the Secretary of State by telephone, facsimile, or e-mail.

The Secretary shall ensure that any vote counts submitted by telephone, facsimile, or e-mail are entered into his or her online elections reporting system as soon as practicable after he or she receives them.

The Secretary’s online elections reporting system shall cause the unofficial vote counts to be posted immediately on the Secretary’s official website as soon as those vote counts are submitted.

The presiding officer and one other election official then shall proceed either to complete the return at once, or to store the summary sheets in a safe and secure place until their retrieval for completion of the return. In any event, not later than 48 hours after the polls close, the presiding officer and at least one other election official shall transfer the totals from the summary sheets to the proper spaces on the return, and both shall sign the return.
(6) (A) The presiding officer and one other election official then shall proceed either to complete the return at once, or to store the summary sheets in a safe and secure place until their retrieval for completion of the return. In any event, not later than 48 hours after the polls close, the presiding officer and at least one other election official shall transfer the totals from the summary sheets to the proper spaces on the return, and both shall sign the return.

The town clerk shall store the summary sheets safely so that the public cannot reasonably have access to them for a period of 90 days without the town clerk’s consent.

The original of the return shall be delivered to the town clerk. In a manner prescribed by the Secretary of State and within 48 hours of the close of the polls, the town clerk shall deliver to the Secretary of State, the senatorial district clerk, the county clerk, and the representative district clerk one certified copy each of the return. The town clerk shall also make a copy available to the public upon request.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 86;

2003, No. 59

, § 39;

2009, No. 40

, § 2;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2015, No. 30

, § 18, eff. May 26, 2015;

2017, No. 50

, § 44.

§ 2589.
Identifying ballots.

When each kind of ballot has been completely counted, each pair of election officials shall securely bind the ballots they have counted and one copy of each tally sheet they have prepared with string or rubber bands and shall, on a separate piece of paper, indicate the number of ballots in the package and the identity of the election officials who counted them, as: “100 ballots counted by John Doe and Mary Smith.”

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2590.
Securing and storing ballots, tally sheets, and checklists.

The following shall not be placed in a sealed container, but shall be delivered to the town clerk along with the sealed containers:
(a) (1) The following shall not be placed in a sealed container, but shall be delivered to the town clerk along with the sealed containers:

ballots that were never distributed to voters;

any vote tabulator memory card; and

the original entrance checklist.

The presiding officer shall collect and deliver to the town clerk, securely sealed in the containers described in subsection (c) of this section, the following:

packages of voted ballots;

envelopes containing ballots that have been replaced;

envelopes containing defective ballots;

the exit checklist, if present;

tally sheets; and

other election material.

A copy of the entrance checklist shall be placed in the outside pocket of the sealed container or otherwise stored along with but outside the sealed container for delivery to the court in the event of a recount.

If the material collected from one polling place is sealed in more than one container, the presiding officer shall ensure that there shall be attached to the container in which the exit checklist is located, a tag stating that the checklist is in that container.

The form of the seal shall be designated and furnished by the Secretary of State in sufficient quantities to each town clerk. The Secretary of State shall require that all seals be safely kept and fully accounted for.

The Secretary of State shall furnish to all town clerks sufficient quantities of uniform-style containers. The Secretary shall establish a method by which the outside of each container shall indicate the contents of the container, the town to which it belongs, and such other pertinent information as may be required.

The town clerk shall safely store the sealed containers and shall not permit them to be removed from his or her custody or tampered with in any way.
(c) (1) The town clerk shall safely store the sealed containers and shall not permit them to be removed from his or her custody or tampered with in any way.

In the event that a container breaks, splits, or opens through handling, or in the event the original entrance checklist or a vote tabulator memory card was inadvertently sealed in a container, the town clerk shall notify the Secretary of State in writing, and the Secretary shall order the town clerk in the presence of two other town election officials who are not members of the same political party to open the bag to remove the entrance checklist or vote tabulator memory card or to move the entire contents to new containers, affix new seals, and transmit the new seal numbers.
(2) (A) In the event that a container breaks, splits, or opens through handling, or in the event the original entrance checklist or a vote tabulator memory card was inadvertently sealed in a container, the town clerk shall notify the Secretary of State in writing, and the Secretary shall order the town clerk in the presence of two other town election officials who are not members of the same political party to open the bag to remove the entrance checklist or vote tabulator memory card or to move the entire contents to new containers, affix new seals, and transmit the new seal numbers.

Containers shall not be removed or tampered with in any other way, except under court order, or by order of any authorized committee of the General Assembly.

If necessary for safe storage of the containers, the town clerk may store them in a bank vault or other secure place, within or outside the town, provided that access to them cannot reasonably be had without the town clerk’s consent.

Except as otherwise provided by federal law, all ballots and tally sheets shall be retained for a period of 90 days from the date of the election, after which time they may be destroyed; provided, however, that if a court order is entered prior to the expiration of the 90-day period, ordering some different disposition of the ballots, the town clerk shall abide by such order.

After the sealed containers are opened as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the town clerk shall file a copy of the entrance or exit checklist and preserve it, together with a statement of discrepancies, as a public record. The checklist shall be retained for a period of at least five years from the date of the election and shall be made available at cost to the public upon request.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 87;

1985, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a);

2007, No. 54

, § 10;

2017, No. 50

, § 45.

§ 2591.
Return not received.

If any canvassing committee does not receive in due time any return required to be forwarded to it, it shall notify the clerk of the town from which the return is lacking, who shall forthwith make another certified copy of the record in his or her office of the lacking return and transmit the same to the committee.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2592.
Canvassing committees; canvass of votes in general or special elections.

For all State and national offices and statewide public questions, the Secretary of State and the chair of the State committee of each major political party (or designee) shall constitute a canvassing committee to receive and tally returns and issue certificates.

For all county offices and countywide public questions, the county clerk and the chair of the county committee of each major political party (or designee) shall constitute a canvassing committee to receive and tally returns and issue certificates.

For State Senator, the senatorial district clerk and the chair of the county committee of each major political party (or designee) in the county for which the senatorial district clerk is clerk shall constitute a canvassing committee to receive and tally returns and issue certificates.

For State Representative, the representative district clerk and one other election official from the district shall serve as a canvassing committee to receive and, if necessary, tally returns and issue certificates.

In the case of the canvassing committees in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, if there is no party organization or party chair in the county, the State committee chair may designate a person to serve on the appropriate canvassing committee.

In the case of primary elections, the canvass of votes shall be made as provided in subchapter 1 of chapter 49 of this title.

In the case of general or special elections, each canvassing committee shall meet at 10:00 a.m. one week after the day of the election and proceed to canvass the votes as provided in subsections (h) through (m) of this section. The canvassing committee may recess from time to time until it has completed its work.

The canvassing committee shall declare the person receiving the largest number of votes for each office to be elected, and it shall issue a certificate of election, signed by a majority of the canvassing committee, in substantially the following form:
(h) (1) The canvassing committee shall declare the person receiving the largest number of votes for each office to be elected, and it shall issue a certificate of election, signed by a majority of the canvassing committee, in substantially the following form:

The committee shall send or deliver the certificate to the candidate elected. In the case of representatives to the General Assembly, the committee shall also send or deliver a copy of each certificate to the Secretary of State.

Click to view

In the case of justices of the peace, the town clerk shall send or deliver a certificate signed by the town clerk and one other election official to each candidate elected. The Secretary of State shall provide certificate forms for this purpose. The town clerk shall also file with the Secretary of State a list of the names and addresses of justices of the peace and shall notify the Secretary of State of any changes in the list as filed.

The certificate shall be a sufficient credential of such person’s election, unless superseded by a court order as provided by subchapter 9 of this chapter.

In the case of the State offices, the canvassing committee shall prepare a certificate of election but shall not sign it.
(k) (1) In the case of the State offices, the canvassing committee shall prepare a certificate of election but shall not sign it.

The prepared certificate shall be presented to the official canvassing committee appointed by the General Assembly, pursuant to Chapter II, § 47 of the Constitution of the State of Vermont, for their use if they desire.

In the case of a tie vote, the canvassing committee shall forthwith petition the appropriate Superior Court for a recount pursuant to section 2602 of this title.
(l) (1) In the case of a tie vote, the canvassing committee shall forthwith petition the appropriate Superior Court for a recount pursuant to section 2602 of this title.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, either of the candidates that is involved in a tie may notify the appropriate Superior Court that he or she is withdrawing, in which case the court shall certify the other candidate as the winner.

Each canvassing committee shall file a report of its findings with the Secretary of State, who shall preserve the reports as permanent records.

State of Vermont
)
) s.s. County
) At , on the day of 20 , a canvassing committee appointed by law completed a canvass of the returns cast at a general election held on the day of , 20 for the office of . The committee hereby certifies that of was duly elected to the office by the voters present and voting.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 88;

2003, No. 59

, § 40;

2017, No. 50

, § 46.

§ 2593.
Participation to be entered on statewide checklist by town clerk.

Not later than 60 days after an annual town meeting, primary election, presidential primary, or general election, the town clerk shall indicate on the town checklist of the statewide checklist each voter’s participation, participation method, and political party of ballot taken, if applicable, in that election by a method approved by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 54

, § 11; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. July 1, 2015;

2015, No. 30

, § 19.